District of Columbia statutes.
7-2871.05

Rules.

(a)

(1)

Within 120 days of October 20, 2011, the Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter.

(b)

The Mayor, through rulemaking, may expand the authority of this chapter to include athletic activities that are non-interscholastic school-sponsored or organized by a non-governmental organization.

History

Oct. 20, 2011, D.C. Law 19-22, § 6, 58 DCR 6506